South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3182.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  It is proposed that the Constitution of this State be amended by adding a new Section to Article I to read: Section 26. All individuals have a natural, inherent, and inalienable right to save and exchange seeds and the right to grow, raise, harvest, produce, and consume the food of their own choosing for their own nourishment, sustenance, bodily health, and well-being, as long as an individual does not commit trespassing, theft, poaching, or other abuses of private property rights, public lands, or natural resources in the harvesting, production, or acquisition of food. SECTION 2.  The proposed amendment must be submitted to the qualified electors at the next general election for representatives.  Ballots must be provided at the various voting precincts with the following words printed or written on the ballot: "Must Article I of the Constitution of this State, relating to the declaration of rights, be amended so as to provide all individuals have a natural, inherent, and inalienable right to save and exchange seeds and the right to grow, raise, harvest, produce, and consume the food of their own choosing for their own nourishment, sustenance, bodily health, and well-being, as long as an individual does not commit trespassing, theft, poaching, or other abuses of private property rights, public lands, or natural resources in the harvesting, production, or acquisition of food?" Yes     o No      o Those voting in favor of the question shall deposit a ballot with a check or cross mark in the square after the word 'Yes', and those voting against the question shall deposit a ballot with a check or cross mark in the square after the word 'No'." SECTION 3.  This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----